SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0067 Y 9
SFX 0067 a ach .
SFX 0067 a aj .
SFX 0067 a am .
SFX 0067 a ami .
SFX 0067 a ojo .
SFX 0067 a omaj .
SFX 0067 a ow .
SFX 0067 a u .
SFX 0067 a y .

SFX 0068 Y 10
SFX 0068 a ach .
SFX 0068 a am .
SFX 0068 a ami .
SFX 0068 a je .
SFX 0068 a o .
SFX 0068 a om .
SFX 0068 a omaj .
SFX 0068 a ow .
SFX 0068 a u .
SFX 0068 a y .

SFX 0069 Y 13
SFX 0069 0 a .
SFX 0069 0 ach .
SFX 0069 0 aj .
SFX 0069 0 am .
SFX 0069 0 ami .
SFX 0069 0 ej .
SFX 0069 0 o .
SFX 0069 0 om .
SFX 0069 0 omaj .
SFX 0069 0 ow .
SFX 0069 0 u .
SFX 0069 0 y .
SFX 0069 0 źe .

SFX 0070 Y 10
SFX 0070 a ach .
SFX 0070 a aj .
SFX 0070 a am .
SFX 0070 a ami .
SFX 0070 a ojo .
SFX 0070 a omaj .
SFX 0070 a ow .
SFX 0070 a u .
SFX 0070 a y .
SFX 0070 a źe .

SFX 0071 Y 10
SFX 0071 ga gach ..
SFX 0071 ga gaj ..
SFX 0071 ga gam ..
SFX 0071 ga gami ..
SFX 0071 ga gi ..
SFX 0071 ga gojo ..
SFX 0071 ga gomaj ..
SFX 0071 ga gow ..
SFX 0071 ga gu ..
SFX 0071 ga ze ..

SFX 0072 Y 10
SFX 0072 še cha ..
SFX 0072 še chach ..
SFX 0072 še chaj ..
SFX 0072 še cham ..
SFX 0072 še chami ..
SFX 0072 še chi ..
SFX 0072 še chojo ..
SFX 0072 še chomaj ..
SFX 0072 še chow ..
SFX 0072 še chu ..

SFX 0073 Y 8
SFX 0073 a ach .
SFX 0073 a aj .
SFX 0073 a am .
SFX 0073 a ami .
SFX 0073 a omaj .
SFX 0073 a ow .
SFX 0073 a u .
SFX 0073 a y .

SFX 0074 Y 8
SFX 0074 0 ach .
SFX 0074 0 am .
SFX 0074 0 ami .
SFX 0074 0 omaj .
SFX 0074 0 ow .
SFX 0074 0 u .
SFX 0074 0 y .
SFX 0074 0 źe .

SFX 0075 Y 10
SFX 0075 a ach .
SFX 0075 a am .
SFX 0075 a ej .
SFX 0075 a emi .
SFX 0075 a o .
SFX 0075 a ojo .
SFX 0075 a om .
SFX 0075 a omaj .
SFX 0075 a ow .
SFX 0075 a u .

SFX 0076 Y 4
SFX 0076 i ach .
SFX 0076 i am .
SFX 0076 i ami .
SFX 0076 i ow .

SFX 0077 Y 8
SFX 0077 še cha ..
SFX 0077 še chach ..
SFX 0077 še cham ..
SFX 0077 še chami ..
SFX 0077 še chi ..
SFX 0077 še chomaj ..
SFX 0077 še chow ..
SFX 0077 še chu ..

SFX 0078 Y 29
SFX 0078 0 ch .
SFX 0078 0 chmoj .
SFX 0078 0 chmy .
SFX 0078 0 chu .
SFX 0078 0 cy .
SFX 0078 0 j .
SFX 0078 0 ja .
SFX 0078 0 jtaj .
SFX 0078 0 jtej .
SFX 0078 0 jće .
SFX 0078 0 li .
SFX 0078 0 m .
SFX 0078 0 moj .
SFX 0078 0 my .
SFX 0078 0 nje .
SFX 0078 0 ny .
SFX 0078 0 taj .
SFX 0078 0 tej .
SFX 0078 0 ć .
SFX 0078 0 će .
SFX 0078 0 ł .
SFX 0078 0 ła .
SFX 0078 0 ło .
SFX 0078 0 łoj .
SFX 0078 0 š .
SFX 0078 0 še .
SFX 0078 0 štaj .
SFX 0078 0 štej .
SFX 0078 0 šće .

SFX 0079 Y 8
SFX 0079 o ach .
SFX 0079 o am .
SFX 0079 o ami .
SFX 0079 o omaj .
SFX 0079 o ow .
SFX 0079 o u .
SFX 0079 o y .
SFX 0079 o źe .

SFX 0080 Y 9
SFX 0080 ta tach ..
SFX 0080 ta tam ..
SFX 0080 ta tami ..
SFX 0080 ta to ..
SFX 0080 ta tom ..
SFX 0080 ta tomaj ..
SFX 0080 ta tow ..
SFX 0080 ta tu ..
SFX 0080 ta će ..

SFX 0081 Y 10
SFX 0081 ta tach ..
SFX 0081 ta taj ..
SFX 0081 ta tam ..
SFX 0081 ta tami ..
SFX 0081 ta tej ..
SFX 0081 ta to ..
SFX 0081 ta tom ..
SFX 0081 ta tomaj ..
SFX 0081 ta tow ..
SFX 0081 ta će ..

SFX 0082 Y 11
SFX 0082 0 ja .
SFX 0082 0 jach .
SFX 0082 0 jam .
SFX 0082 0 je .
SFX 0082 0 jej .
SFX 0082 0 jemi .
SFX 0082 0 jo .
SFX 0082 0 jom .
SFX 0082 0 jomaj .
SFX 0082 0 jow .
SFX 0082 0 ju .

SFX 0083 Y 8
SFX 0083 ha hach ..
SFX 0083 ha ham ..
SFX 0083 ha hami ..
SFX 0083 ha hi ..
SFX 0083 ha homaj ..
SFX 0083 ha how ..
SFX 0083 ha hu ..
SFX 0083 ha ze ..

SFX 0084 Y 13
SFX 0084 0 a .
SFX 0084 0 ach .
SFX 0084 0 aj .
SFX 0084 0 am .
SFX 0084 0 ami .
SFX 0084 0 ej .
SFX 0084 0 je .
SFX 0084 0 jo .
SFX 0084 0 o .
SFX 0084 0 om .
SFX 0084 0 omaj .
SFX 0084 0 ow .
SFX 0084 0 u .

SFX 0085 Y 10
SFX 0085 a eni .
SFX 0085 a enja .
SFX 0085 a enjach .
SFX 0085 a enjam .
SFX 0085 a enjemi .
SFX 0085 a enjom .
SFX 0085 a enjomaj .
SFX 0085 a enjow .
SFX 0085 a enju .
SFX 0085 a o .

SFX 0086 Y 30
SFX 0086 0 i .
SFX 0086 0 ili .
SFX 0086 0 imoj .
SFX 0086 0 imy .
SFX 0086 0 itaj .
SFX 0086 0 itej .
SFX 0086 0 ić .
SFX 0086 0 iće .
SFX 0086 0 ił .
SFX 0086 0 iła .
SFX 0086 0 iło .
SFX 0086 0 iłoj .
SFX 0086 0 iš .
SFX 0086 0 ja .
SFX 0086 0 jach .
SFX 0086 0 jachmoj .
SFX 0086 0 jachmy .
SFX 0086 0 jachu .
SFX 0086 0 jacy .
SFX 0086 0 jenje .
SFX 0086 0 jeny .
SFX 0086 0 ješe .
SFX 0086 0 ještaj .
SFX 0086 0 ještej .
SFX 0086 0 ješće .
SFX 0086 0 ju .
SFX 0086 0 my .
SFX 0086 0 taj .
SFX 0086 0 tej .
SFX 0086 0 će .

SFX 0087 Y 38
SFX 0087 ce ceja ..
SFX 0087 ce cem ..
SFX 0087 ce cemoj ..
SFX 0087 ce cemy ..
SFX 0087 ce cetaj ..
SFX 0087 ce cetej ..
SFX 0087 ce ceće ..
SFX 0087 ce ceš ..
SFX 0087 ce ta ..
SFX 0087 ce tach ..
SFX 0087 ce tachmoj ..
SFX 0087 ce tachmy ..
SFX 0087 ce tachu ..
SFX 0087 ce tacy ..
SFX 0087 ce taj ..
SFX 0087 ce taja ..
SFX 0087 ce tajtaj ..
SFX 0087 ce tajtej ..
SFX 0087 ce tajće ..
SFX 0087 ce tali ..
SFX 0087 ce tam ..
SFX 0087 ce tamoj ..
SFX 0087 ce tamy ..
SFX 0087 ce tanje ..
SFX 0087 ce tany ..
SFX 0087 ce tataj ..
SFX 0087 ce tatej ..
SFX 0087 ce tać ..
SFX 0087 ce taće ..
SFX 0087 ce tał ..
SFX 0087 ce tała ..
SFX 0087 ce tało ..
SFX 0087 ce tałoj ..
SFX 0087 ce taš ..
SFX 0087 ce taše ..
SFX 0087 ce taštaj ..
SFX 0087 ce taštej ..
SFX 0087 ce tašće ..

SFX 0088 Y 12
SFX 0088 y ja .
SFX 0088 y jach .
SFX 0088 y jam .
SFX 0088 y jej .
SFX 0088 y jemi .
SFX 0088 y jo .
SFX 0088 y jojo .
SFX 0088 y jom .
SFX 0088 y jomaj .
SFX 0088 y jow .
SFX 0088 y ju .
SFX 0088 y yja .

SFX 0089 Y 30
SFX 0089 j ja .
SFX 0089 j jach .
SFX 0089 j jachmoj .
SFX 0089 j jachmy .
SFX 0089 j jachu .
SFX 0089 j jacy .
SFX 0089 j je .
SFX 0089 j jemoj .
SFX 0089 j jemy .
SFX 0089 j jetaj .
SFX 0089 j jetej .
SFX 0089 j jeće .
SFX 0089 j ješ .
SFX 0089 j ješe .
SFX 0089 j ještaj .
SFX 0089 j ještej .
SFX 0089 j ješće .
SFX 0089 j jtaj .
SFX 0089 j jtej .
SFX 0089 j ju .
SFX 0089 j jće .
SFX 0089 j li .
SFX 0089 j ty .
SFX 0089 j ć .
SFX 0089 j će .
SFX 0089 j ł .
SFX 0089 j ła .
SFX 0089 j łe .
SFX 0089 j ło .
SFX 0089 j łoj .

SFX 0090 Y 11
SFX 0090 ń nja .
SFX 0090 ń njach .
SFX 0090 ń njam .
SFX 0090 ń nje .
SFX 0090 ń njej .
SFX 0090 ń njemi .
SFX 0090 ń njo .
SFX 0090 ń njom .
SFX 0090 ń njomaj .
SFX 0090 ń njow .
SFX 0090 ń nju .

SFX 0091 Y 15
SFX 0091 a aj .
SFX 0091 a e .
SFX 0091 a eho .
SFX 0091 a ej .
SFX 0091 a eje .
SFX 0091 a eju .
SFX 0091 a emu .
SFX 0091 a oh .
SFX 0091 a om .
SFX 0091 a u .
SFX 0091 a y .
SFX 0091 a ych .
SFX 0091 a ym .
SFX 0091 a ymaj .
SFX 0091 a ymi .

SFX 0092 Y 26
SFX 0092 er era ..
SFX 0092 er erach ..
SFX 0092 er eraj ..
SFX 0092 er eram ..
SFX 0092 er erami ..
SFX 0092 er erej ..
SFX 0092 er erje ..
SFX 0092 er ero ..
SFX 0092 er erom ..
SFX 0092 er eromaj ..
SFX 0092 er erow ..
SFX 0092 er eru ..
SFX 0092 er ery ..
SFX 0092 er ra ..
SFX 0092 er rach ..
SFX 0092 er raj ..
SFX 0092 er ram ..
SFX 0092 er rami ..
SFX 0092 er rej ..
SFX 0092 er rje ..
SFX 0092 er ro ..
SFX 0092 er rom ..
SFX 0092 er romaj ..
SFX 0092 er row ..
SFX 0092 er ru ..
SFX 0092 er ry ..

SFX 0093 Y 19
SFX 0093 ta taj ..
SFX 0093 ta te ..
SFX 0093 ta teho ..
SFX 0093 ta tej ..
SFX 0093 ta teje ..
SFX 0093 ta teju ..
SFX 0093 ta temu ..
SFX 0093 ta toh ..
SFX 0093 ta tom ..
SFX 0093 ta tu ..
SFX 0093 ta ty ..
SFX 0093 ta tych ..
SFX 0093 ta tym ..
SFX 0093 ta tymaj ..
SFX 0093 ta tymi ..
SFX 0093 ta će ..
SFX 0093 ta ći ..
SFX 0093 ta ćiši ..
SFX 0093 ta ćišo ..

SFX 0094 Y 30
SFX 0094 ń ni .
SFX 0094 ń nili .
SFX 0094 ń nimoj .
SFX 0094 ń nimy .
SFX 0094 ń nitaj .
SFX 0094 ń nitej .
SFX 0094 ń nić .
SFX 0094 ń niće .
SFX 0094 ń nił .
SFX 0094 ń niła .
SFX 0094 ń niło .
SFX 0094 ń niłoj .
SFX 0094 ń niš .
SFX 0094 ń nja .
SFX 0094 ń njach .
SFX 0094 ń njachmoj .
SFX 0094 ń njachmy .
SFX 0094 ń njachu .
SFX 0094 ń njacy .
SFX 0094 ń njenje .
SFX 0094 ń njeny .
SFX 0094 ń nješe .
SFX 0094 ń nještaj .
SFX 0094 ń nještej .
SFX 0094 ń nješće .
SFX 0094 ń nju .
SFX 0094 ń ńmy .
SFX 0094 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0094 ń ńtej .
SFX 0094 ń ńće .

SFX 0095 Y 9
SFX 0095 ce ka ..
SFX 0095 ce kach ..
SFX 0095 ce kam ..
SFX 0095 ce kami ..
SFX 0095 ce ko ..
SFX 0095 ce kom ..
SFX 0095 ce komaj ..
SFX 0095 ce kow ..
SFX 0095 ce ku ..
