SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Apaše/0072
Apolla/0075
Běłorusa/0067
Delnjosaksa/0067
Francoza/0067
Friesa/0067
Friza/0067
Fryca/0067
Indoneza/0067
Karthaga/0068
Kazaše/0072
Kobjelń/0090
Kursaksa/0067
Lichań/0090
Njechań/0090
Poznań/0090
Prusa/0067
Radwor/0082
Roholń/0090
Saksa/0067
U-železa/0068
Zahor/0082
antipoda/0070
antropoid/0069
antropologa/0071
apaloosa/0073
apartheid/0074
arcywójwoda/0070
astrologa/0071
awokado/0079
awta/0081
awtor/0084
awtoradija/0085
baby/0088
backhand/0074
bager/0092
band/0074
bastard/0069
big-band/0074
bigband/0074
binga/0068
biologa/0071
blejše/0077
bluwanki/0076
boy/0088
bruttowaha/0083
bubnar/0082
błudń/0094
ceše/0077
chrjaše/0077
coologa/0071
cowboy/0088
cyše/0077
dakoce/0087
deńca/0068
deńčce/0095
dialektologa/0071
direktor/0084
diskjockey/0088
dojědki/0076
doktor/0084
doktorand/0069
dospołń/0094
dołojta/0093
drjewotočer/0082
drohokamjeń/0090
dróha/0083
drěma/0078
dwuměsta/0080
dłóžb/0086
dźělatce/0095
dźěćaca/0091
entomologa/0071
epoše/0077
esperanta/0081
espresa/0068
felaše/0072
filologa/0071
forehand/0074
fota/0080
fota/0081
gastropod/0069
ghetta/0080
ghetta/0081
grafita/0080
grafologa/0071
gutaperše/0077
habilitand/0069
hazard/0069
hnij/0089
hniliznojta/0093
hněžce/0095
hołb/0082
hrabički/0076
hrjebjeń/0090
husaca/0091
hušce/0095
ideologa/0071
inwalida/0070
jasń/0094
jazzband/0074
ječmjeń/0090
jockey/0088
juše/0077
jěd/0069
jěrše/0077
kaj/0089
kantor/0084
kantor/0086
kapa/0075
kapoce/0087
kaponki/0076
kisałkojta/0093
klasikar/0082
klinka/0078
kmótřaca/0091
kniha/0083
komplica/0067
konta/0080
korta/0080
krup/0086
krušwjaca/0091
krótkopowědančce/0095
kulata/0093
křemjeń/0090
křćij/0089
lasa/0068
lačń/0094
leopard/0069
libera/0075
libreta/0081
liftboy/0088
lizanki/0076
loga/0068
lota/0080
lud/0069
lěnkojta/0093
machoce/0087
macoše/0077
malteza/0067
mača/0075
mementa/0080
mementa/0081
mestica/0067
metalurga/0071
miksowar/0082
miškr/0086
mjasa/0068
mjedwjedźatce/0095
mjezowaca/0091
myta/0080
měnita/0093
městopředsyda/0070
nahłowjaca/0091
naměsta/0080
naspomina/0078
nawoda/0070
negrida/0070
negroida/0070
nettowaha/0083
neurologa/0071
njebahń/0094
njebaj/0089
njebórboce/0087
njebłudń/0094
njedospołń/0094
njedowoteměra/0078
njedrjechm/0086
njeduj/0089
njegagoce/0087
njehrěj/0089
njehuntor/0086
njejasń/0094
njekiwa/0078
njeknyskoce/0087
njekraw/0086
njekłój/0089
njelubkar/0086
njemyj/0089
njenakrawa/0078
njepapoce/0087
njepisań/0094
njepřidawa/0078
njerjapoce/0087
njesantor/0086
njeschnyj/0089
njeslěborń/0094
njesměwkoce/0087
njesuwa/0078
njewij/0089
njewupada/0078
njewětr/0086
njewłóžń/0094
nječmuchoce/0087
nječumpa/0078
nješćerkoce/0087
nješćěp/0086
nježuj/0089
nomad/0069
nomada/0070
nožički/0076
nuknicar/0082
obeliskojta/0093
organizator/0084
ortopeda/0070
patologa/0071
piha/0083
pikola/0075
piwce/0095
pjelše/0077
pjerica/0068
plusker/0082
podobń/0094
podwaha/0083
pohrabki/0076
polětuše/0077
powaha/0083
powjetšowaca/0091
powětroń/0090
počornojta/0093
połlěta/0080
pradźěd/0069
pruha/0083
pumpoce/0087
pyr/0082
pyše/0077
pólce/0095
pěski/0076
płuca/0068
předsyda/0070
předłoha/0083
přehnawa/0078
přestajowaca/0091
přisaha/0083
pšeńcata/0093
redaktor/0084
risotta/0080
risotta/0081
rizota/0081
ropuše/0077
ryćer/0086
röntgenologa/0071
sad/0069
schnyj/0089
schodźeń/0090
sgrafita/0081
skaliznata/0093
smaha/0083
smorkoce/0087
smorženki/0076
smyka/0078
sobar/0082
sobjaca/0091
sornjatce/0095
soń/0094
susod/0069
swinjaca/0091
symjenita/0093
słowjesa/0068
tarawaha/0083
technologa/0071
torera/0075
tory/0088
truhanki/0076
truhančce/0095
tydźeń/0090
třikolesa/0068
třěše/0077
wakojta/0093
wij/0089
wiki/0076
wirtuoza/0067
wjazar/0082
wjelrybjaca/0091
wobměsta/0080
wojewoda/0070
woknješce/0095
wotroha/0083
wottawa/0078
wotškrabanki/0076
wroblaca/0091
wulkowójwoda/0070
wupyšer/0082
wučer/0086
wysokopjenkata/0093
wójwoda/0070
wóslaca/0091
wěšatce/0095
x-pruhi/0076
zakoń/0090
zběha/0083
zorń/0094
zwodźěwa/0078
zynkoćělesa/0068
ćikoce/0087
čerwjaca/0091
čisličce/0095
črijki/0076
łopjenata/0093
łónca/0068
Šweda/0070
šešer/0082
šimpansa/0073
škórń/0090
šosar/0086
štwórćlěta/0080
žid/0069
žonisce/0095
žuj/0089
